District of Columbia statutes.
7-531.08

Status of volunteers; reimbursement.

Volunteers shall not, by virtue of their participation in the program or a demonstration project, be entitled to monetary compensation or considered for any purpose to be employees or agents of either the District or a sponsor. Sponsors may reimburse volunteers for necessary expenses incident to their provision of targeted or demonstration project services, attendance at pre-service or in-service training, or performance of administrative tasks in direct support of the program or demonstration project.

Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-143, § 9, 33 DCR 4372
1981 Ed., § 6-2248.